Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-103 Application for charter. (a)
Five or more residents of this State who share a common bond may file an
application with the commissioner to engage in the business of a credit union.

(b) The application shall contain the
following information, unless waived by the commissioner:

(1) The proposed name of the credit union;

(2) Proposed lease agreements for its principal
office;

(3) The territory in which the proposed credit union
will operate;

(4) A business plan;

(5) Employment history, education, management
experience, and other biographical information for all original chartering
applicants, and proposed executive officers of the credit union;

(6) Proposed policies regarding loans, investments,
operations, accounting, recordkeeping, and applicable federal and state
consumer laws;

(7) Information necessary to conduct a criminal
history record check in accordance with section 846-2.7 of each of the original
chartering applicants and proposed executive officers of the credit union,
accompanied by payment of the applicable fee for each record check to be
conducted; and

(8) Any other information that the commissioner may
require.

(c) The application shall be submitted on a
form prescribed by the commissioner. The application shall be accompanied by a
fee established by section 412:2-105.2, no part of which shall be refundable. [L
1993, c 350, pt of §1; am L 2008, c 196, §8; am L 2016, c 149, §13]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next